District of Columbia statutes.
3-2202

Repealed

Board of Interior Designers; qualifications of members; terms of office.

Repealed.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-172, § 3, 33 DCR 7211
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1232, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 2-3402.